Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 36 Municipal Energy Authority Act
7-36-122. Payments in lieu of taxes.

The authority is authorized to pay or cause to be paid from the revenues of each of the systems for each fiscal year payments in lieu of taxes to the associated municipality or such other municipality as shall properly receive said payments. Payments from the electric system revenues must be made and computed in accordance with the Municipal Electric Plant Law of 1935, compiled in chapter 52, part 1 of this title, and payments made from revenues of the telecommunication system must be made in accordance with §§7-52-404 and7-52-606. Payments made from revenues of the water and wastewater systems must be made by agreement with the affected municipality. The authority shall make payments in lieu of taxes to the associated municipality, accruing from and after the effective date of the transfer of such system or systems from the associated municipality, from such system's revenues on the same basis as payments are currently being made by the supervisory body. The authority shall provide the associated municipality with a copy of its annual audited financial statements at the time each such annual payment is made and shall provide access to such financial information of the authority as is necessary for the associated municipality to review the basis for and amounts of payments required pursuant to this section. To the extent not otherwise addressed in chapter 52, parts 4 and 6 of this title, in connection with the provision of telecommunications service, the authority is subject to all other state and local fees and charges imposed upon private providers of telecommunications services.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 16.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in the second sentence, substituted “must” for “shall” twice, deleted “, part 1” following “chapter 52”, and substituted “telecommunication” for “telecommunications” preceding “system”; added the present third sentence; in the present fourth sentence, substituted “such system or systems” for “the electric system” following “transfer of”, “such system's” for “the electric system” preceding “revenues on”, and “body” for “board” at the end; and, in the last sentence, substituted “is” for “shall be” preceding “subject to” and “telecommunications” for “such” preceding “services”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

7-36-123. Deposit of moneys.

All moneys of the authority, from whatever source derived, shall be deposited in one (1) or more banks or trust companies and, to the extent required of political subdivisions of this state, such accounts shall be continuously insured by an agency of the federal government or secured by a pledge of direct obligations of the United States or of this state having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, at all times at least equal to the balance on deposit in any such account. Such securities shall either be deposited with the authority or held by a trustee or agent satisfactory to the authority. In lieu of any pledge of such securities, the deposits may be secured by a surety bond, which shall be in form, sufficiency, and substance satisfactory to the authority.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-124. Investment of funds.

All funds of the authority are authorized to be invested as follows:

Direct obligations of the United States government or any of its agencies;

Obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States government or any of its agencies;

Certificates of deposit and other evidences of deposit at state and federally chartered banks, savings and loan institutions, or savings banks deposited and collateralized as described in § 7-36-123;

Repurchase agreements entered into with the United States or its agencies or with any bank, broker-dealer, or other such entity so long as the obligation of the obligated party is secured by a perfected pledge of full faith and credit obligations of the United States or its agencies;

Guaranteed investment contracts or similar agreements providing for a specified rate of return over a specified time period with entities rated, at the time of investment, in one (1) of the two (2) highest rating categories of a nationally recognized rating agency;

The local government investment pool created by title 9, chapter 4, part 7;

Direct general obligations of a state of the United States, or a political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, having general taxing powers and rated, at the time of investment, in either of the two (2) highest rating categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations;

Obligations of any state of the United States or a political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, secured solely by revenues received by, or on behalf of, the state or political subdivision or instrumentality thereof irrevocably pledged to the payment of the principal and interest on such obligations, rated, at the time of investment, in the two (2) highest rating categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations;

The authority's own bonds or notes; or

Any additional investments authorized to be made by a municipal electric system in this state.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-125. Assets after cessation of existence of authority.

If the authority ceases to exist, or in the event of the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the electric system of the authority, all of its assets remaining after all of its obligations and liabilities have been satisfied or discharged shall pass to, and become the property of, the associated municipality.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-126. Authority as political subdivision for purposes of regulation of public utilities.

The authority is and shall be considered a political subdivision for purposes of title 65, chapter 4.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-127. Board as governing body for purposes of Open Meetings Act.

The board shall be considered a governing body for purposes of the open meetings act, compiled in title 8, chapter 44.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-128. Authority as governmental entity for purposes of Governmental Tort Liability Act.

The authority shall be considered a governmental entity for purposes of the Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 20.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-129. Authority as public agency for purposes of Interlocal Cooperation Act.

The authority shall be considered a public agency for purposes of the Interlocal Cooperation Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 9.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-130. Authority as municipality, associated municipality, and governing body for purposes of Energy Acquisition Corporations Act.

The authority shall be considered a municipality for the purposes of the Energy Acquisition Corporations Act, compiled in chapter 39 of this title and may be an associated municipality of an energy acquisition corporation under such act, and the board shall be a governing body for purposes of such act.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-131. Powers conferred by chapter additional to other powers.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition, and supplemental, to the powers conferred by any other law.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-132. Transfer from associated municipality to authority.

The associated municipality is authorized to transfer to an authority created pursuant to this chapter all of the associated municipality's right, title, and interest in and all the assets of the municipal electric, water, wastewater, and telecommunications systems, or any one (1) or more of such systems, including all real and personal property, tangible or intangible, and any right or interest in any such property, whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges, or other encumbrances, and all appurtenances, contracts, leases, franchises, and other intangibles must be transferred to the authority. The transfer must be authorized by resolution of the governing body of the associated municipality adopted on one (1) reading and must be accomplished through documents and instruments authorized by the resolution and executed by the officers of the associated municipality as designated by the resolution. A transfer of an associated municipality's electric or telecommunications system to an authority in accordance with this subsection (a) is not a disposition of assets for purposes of § 7-52-132.

Upon formation of an authority pursuant to this chapter, a franchise is granted to the authority to provide within the corporate limits of the associated municipality any and all of the services that it is authorized to provide under applicable law and as set forth in its certificate of incorporation, subject to payment in lieu of taxes pursuant to § 7-36-122. Consistent with § 7-36-107(a)(6), the associated municipality may require such franchise or franchises for the provision of telecommunications services as are permitted under state or federal law.

Upon transfer of an electric, water, or wastewater system from an associated municipality to an authority and the assumption or satisfaction of all obligations of the supervisory board, the jurisdiction and control of the associated municipality and the supervisory board over such system must be transferred to the authority, and the supervisory board having oversight over such system shall cease to exist.

It is a condition of the transfer of a system from the associated municipality to the authority that upon the transfer the authority must either retire the associated municipality's bonds associated with such system by the payment of the bonds in full upon transfer, defease such associated municipality's bonds by depositing funds in irrevocable escrow for the payment of these bonds, or assume and agree to pay in full principal of and interest on such bonds of the associated municipality. Upon the assumption by the authority of the associated municipality bonds and its agreement to pay those bonds when due, the authority shall be fully obligated to pay when due, principal, premium, and interest with respect to those bonds with the same force and effect as if those bonds were issued by the authority. Bonds issued pursuant to this section must be secured by, and payable from, the revenues of the respective system in the same way as other bonds of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter. The transfer of each of the systems must be accomplished in such a manner as not to impair the obligations of contract with reference to the associated municipality's bonds and other legal obligations of the associated municipality and to preserve and protect the contract rights vested in the owners of such bonds and other obligations.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 17.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “must” for “shall” wherever it appears; in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “electric, water, wastewater, and telecommunications systems, or any one (1) or more of such systems” for “electric system and the telecommunications system, if any”, in the next to last sentence, substituted “the officers” for “such officers” following “executed by”, and in the last sentence, inserted “of an associated municipality's electric or telecommunications system” following “A transfer” and substituted “is not a” for “shall not be deemed” preceding “a disposition”; in (b), deleted “electric” following “any and all of the”, inserted “and as set forth in its certificate of incorporation” following “applicable law”, and substituted “§7-36-107(7)” for “§7-36-107(4)” following “Consistent with”; in (c), substituted “an electric, water, or wastewater system” for “the electric system” following “Upon transfer of” and inserted “having oversight over such system”; and, in (d), substituted “It is” for “It shall be”, “the transfer” for “such transfer” following “that upon”, and “of the bonds” for “thereof” following “by the payment”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.